Vermont, session 2025-2026, H751.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REPEAL
30 V.S.A. § 248a (certificate of public good for communications facilities)
is repealed.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6001 is amended to read:
§ 6001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #386419 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.751
2026 Page 2 of 6
(3)(A) “Development” means each of the following:
* * *
(ix) Any support structure or telecommunication facility or
apparatus proposed for construction that is primarily for communication or
broadcast purposes and that will extend vertically 20 feet or more above the
highest point of an attached to an existing structure, or 50 feet or more above
ground level in the case of a proposed new support structure, in order to
transmit or receive communication signals for commercial, industrial,
municipal, county, or State purposes, independently of the acreage involved.
Development also includes the construction of small cell antennas.
(I) Under this subdivision (ix):
(aa) the word “development” shall also include includes the
construction of improvements ancillary to the support structure, including
buildings, broadcast or communication equipment, foundation pads, cables,
wires, antennas or hardware, and all means of ingress and egress to the support
structure; and
(bb) the word “development” shall does not include future
improvements that are not ancillary to the support structure and do not involve
an additional support structure, unless they would otherwise be considered a
development under this subdivision (3).
VT LEG #386419 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.751
2026 Page 3 of 6
(II) The criteria and procedures for obtaining a permit for a
development under this subdivision (ix) shall be the same as for any other
development;.
(III) As used in this subdivision (ix), “small cell antenna”
means a compact, low-powered radio node that supplements large cellular
networks (macrocells) by providing better coverage and capacity in smaller
areas, often mounted on existing infrastructure like streetlights, utility poles,
and buildings for 5G and other wireless services, acting like miniature cell
towers to handle dense user demand.
* * *
(D) The word “development” does not include:
* * *
(ii) The construction of improvements for an electric generation,
energy storage, or transmission facility that requires a certificate of public
good under 30 V.S.A. § 248 or is subject to regulation under 30 V.S.A. § 8011;
or a natural gas facility as defined in 30 V.S.A. § 248(a)(3); or a
telecommunications facility issued a certificate of public good under 30 V.S.A.
§ 248a.
* * *
VT LEG #386419 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.751
2026 Page 4 of 6
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6086(c) is amended to read:
(c)(1) Permit conditions. A permit may contain such requirements and
conditions as are allowable proper exercise of the police power and that are
appropriate within the respect to subdivisions (a)(1) through (10)(a)(1)–(10) of
this section, including those set forth in 24 V.S.A. §§ 4414(4), 4424(a)(2),
4414(1)(D)(i), 4463(b), and 4464, the dedication of lands for public use, and
the filing of bonds to ensure compliance. The requirements and conditions
incorporated from Title 24 may be applied whether or not a local plan has been
adopted. General requirements and conditions may be established by rule of
the Land Use Review Board.
* * *
(3) Permit conditions on a telecommunications facility. When issuing a
permit with conditions on a telecommunications facility, including a small cell
antenna, the District Commission shall include that the facility:
(A) Be at least 2,000 feet from any residence, commercial property,
school, playground, public park, swimming pool, public beach, daycare, or
hospital.
(B) Have a radiation signal strength metered at the location not to
exceed -75 decibel-milliwatts (dBm) for any frequency or channel band
specified by a transmitting entity’s Federal Communications Commission
transmission license; or, the maximum power output limit from all frequencies
VT LEG #386419 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.751
2026 Page 5 of 6
or antennas from a wireless facility shall not exceed 0.1 watts of effective
radiated power (ERP) so as to provide -75 dBm signal strength at one-half
mile, or five bars on a cell phone. If signal strength metered by a radio
frequency engineer exceeds -75 dBm, the facility operator has 30 days to
achieve compliance without disruption to the performance of Vermonters’
personal wireless services. Failure to comply with this subdivision (B) shall
result in a penalty, as established by the Board in rule. The permit holder shall
submit annually a certification to the District Commission that the facility is in
compliance with this requirement, as certified by a licensed engineer.
(C) Poles or other structures in public rights-of-way that hold a 5G or
similar radio frequency (RF) radiating antenna be labeled indicating RF-
radiation being emitted above. This label shall be at eye level and legible from
nine feet away.
(D) RF emissions are monitored annually for all radiating antennas
and components by a qualified, independent RF engineer to be hired by the
Board at the permittee’s expense. The report containing all test results shall be
submitted to the Board within 30 days following completion and not later than
the close of the calendar year.
(E) Implement and adhere to RF-radiation safety limits established
by the Agency of Natural Resources and determined to be protective of
wildlife and flora, including trees, plants, birds, insects, and pollinators.
VT LEG #386419 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.751
2026 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 6094 is added to read:
§ 6094. TELECOMMUNICATIONS FACILITY INVESTIGATIONS
The Department of Public Service shall provide technical assistance to the
Land Use Review Board, if needed, when reviewing and investigating
radiation signal strength from telecommunications facilities. On or before
December 31, 2026, the Board and the Department shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding establishing the Department’s ability to assist
the Board in the enforcement of telecommunications facility permit conditions.
The Department may establish a fee for such assistance.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 4154 is added to read:
§ 4154. RADIO FREQUENCY STANDARDS
The Commissioner shall adopt rules establishing, consistent with any
applicable Federal standards, radio frequency limits based on acceptable limits
necessary to protect the health of wildlife.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386419 v.5